New York, session 2025-2026, S8017.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 58 of the highway law, as amended by chapter 1110 2 of the laws of 1971, is amended to read as follows: 3 § 58. Liability of state for damages. The state shall not be liable 4 for damages suffered by any person from defects in state highways, 5 except between the first day of [May] April and the [fifteenth] first 6 day of [November] December on such highways as are maintained by the 7 state under such system as the commissioner of transportation may adopt 8 pursuant to section twelve of this chapter, but the liability for such 9 damages shall otherwise remain as now provided by law, notwithstanding 10 the construction or improvement and maintenance of such highways by the 11 state under this chapter; but nothing herein contained shall be 12 construed to impose on the state any liability for defects in bridges 13 over which the state has no control. Within the limits of incorporated 14 villages the state shall maintain a width of pavement equal to the width 15 of pavement constructed or improved at the expense of the state, if a 16 state highway, the location of the state's portion of such roadway with- 17 in said incorporated limits to be determined by the center line of the 18 roadway as shown on the plans on file with the department of transporta- 19 tion and the state shall be liable for damages to persons or property 20 only when such damage shall occur as a result of the defective condition 21 of the portion of improved highway as above described. 22 § 2. This act shall take effect on the first of April next succeeding 23 the date on which it shall have become a law. Effective immediately, the 24 addition, amendment and/or repeal of any rule or regulation necessary 25 for the implementation of this act on its effective date are authorized 26 to be made and completed on or before such effective date. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD07612-01-5